Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
Article 12 Street, Suburban, and Interurban Railroads

46-8-330.
“Interurban railroads” defined.

As used in this article, the term “interurban railroads” means railroads which are operated by gas or electricity and which run from, into, and between cities.

History.

Ga. L. 1916, p. 44, § 1; Ga. L. 1921, p. 107, § 1; Code 1933, § 94-1001.

46-8-331.
Incorporation, control, and management of interurban, suburban, and street railroads.

All of the provisions of this title regarding the incorporation, control, and management of railroad companies in general shall also apply to interurban, suburban, and street railroad companies, insofar as such provisions are applicable and appropriate thereto. Any group of at least ten persons who desire to be incorporated as an interurban, suburban, or street railroad company may form a corporation in the same manner as provided for the formation of other railroad companies, with the additional requirement that they shall in their petition specify in what cities, and in what streets thereof, they propose to construct and build the railroad, provided that no street railroad or interurban railroad incorporated under this chapter shall be constructed within the limits of any incorporated city without the consent of the corporate authorities; provided, further, that all railroad companies incorporated under this chapter shall be subject to all just and reasonable rules and regulations by the corporate authorities and shall be liable for all assessments and other lawful burdens that may be imposed upon them with reference to the railroad or the portion thereof located within the limits of the municipal corporation; provided, further, that only such powers and franchises as are conferred on other railroad companies by this title shall belong to interurban, suburban, or street railroad companies, as shall be necessary and appropriate thereto, and such other provisions of this title as apply to other railroads located outside of urban or suburban areas shall apply to interurban, suburban, and street railroad companies insofar as that portion of their roads is concerned.

History.

Ga. L. 1894, p. 69, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 2180; Ga. L. 1903, p. 38, § 1; Civil Code 1910, § 2600; Ga. L. 1916, p. 44, § 1; Ga. L. 1921, p. 107, § 1; Code 1933, § 94-1002; Ga. L. 2017, p. 774, § 46/HB 323.

The 2017 amendment,

effective May 9, 2017, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, deleted “; provided, further, that nothing in Code Section 46-8-127, which provides that the general direction and location of railroads sought to be constructed in this state shall be ten miles from a railroad constructed or laid out and selected to be constructed, shall be applicable to street, suburban, or interurban railways, or the selection of the route or the construction of the same” following “is concerned” in the last sentence.

46-8-332.
Power of street, suburban, or interurban railroad corporation to increase capital stock; manner of increase.

Any corporation owning or operating a street, suburban, or interurban railroad in this state shall have the right to increase its capital stock from time to time.

In no case shall an increase of capital stock be made except by a vote of two-thirds of the outstanding capital stock entitled to vote by the terms of the charter, represented either in person or by proxy at an annual or special meeting of stockholders called for the purpose and after each stockholder has been notified in the manner, if any, prescribed for giving notice of stockholders’ meetings in the bylaws of the corporation. In addition to such notice, there shall be published in some newspaper in the town or city where the principal office of the corporation is located, once a week for four weeks prior to the time of holding said meeting, a notice stating that at such meeting an increase of the stock of the company will be considered.

History.

Ga. L. 1902, p. 68, § 1; Civil Code 1910, § 2601; Ga. L. 1925, p. 94, § 1; Code 1933, §§ 94-1003, 94-1004.

46-8-333.
Use of electricity, gasoline, or gas by street, suburban, and interurban railroads; operation of gas and electric plants, generation and furnishing of gas and electricity by railroads.

Any street, suburban, or interurban railroad company may use electricity, gasoline, or gas in propelling its engines or cars, running machinery, and for other purposes.

Any such company may operate gas and electric plants and generate and furnish gas and electric light, heat, and power to any county or city and also to companies and private citizens, and may charge and collect reasonable compensation for the same, to be fixed and determined by the commission.

Any street, suburban, or interurban railroad company may buy, own, hold, lease, and use such property as may be necessary or convenient in the exercise of the powers granted by this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1916, p. 44, § 1; Ga. L. 1921, p. 107, § 1; Ga. L. 1923, p. 128, § 1; Code 1933, § 94-1006.

46-8-334.
Purchase, mortgage, transfer, or disposal of capital stock, bonds, or other indebtedness; acquisition of property, rights, and franchises.

By vote of a majority of the outstanding capital stock, any corporation formed under the laws of this state for the purpose of operating by electricity a street railroad, suburban railroad, or interurban railroad, or for the purpose of generating electricity, may guaranty; purchase or otherwise acquire; own; hold; mortgage; pledge; sell; assign; and transfer or otherwise dispose of all of its capital stock, bonds, securities, or other evidence of indebtedness and may issue its bonds and stock in payment thereof. Any electric railroad corporation organized under the laws of this or any adjacent state for the purpose of connecting its railroad, constructed or about to be constructed, with any railroad constructed by any other electric railroad company, or for the purpose of obtaining motive power for its operation, may acquire, by lease, purchase, merger, or consolidation, the property, rights, and franchises of any other electric railroad corporation, or of any corporation formed for the purpose of generating electricity, organized under the laws of this or any adjacent state; and any railroad or electric corporation organized under the laws of this state is authorized in any such case to dispose, in like manner, of its property, rights and franchises. No act shall be deemed authorized under this Code section which is inhibited by any provision of the Constitution of Georgia or by any provision of the Constitution or statutes of the United States, or which has the effect or is intended to have the effect of defeating or lessening competition or of encouraging monopoly.

History.

Ga. L. 1909, p. 163, § 1; Ga. L. 1910, p. 95, § 1; Civil Code 1910, § 2607; Code 1933, § 94-1014.

46-8-335.
Time of effectiveness of guaranty or acquisition of stock, property, and franchises; protection of rights of dissenting stockholders.

No guaranty or acquisition of stock, securities, property, rights, or franchises of any corporation shall become effective under Code Section 46-8-334 until the expiration of 30 days from the authorization of such guaranty or acquisition by the stockholders.

If any stockholder who does not vote in favor of such action files with the secretary of the corporation, within 30 days of the authorization by the other stockholders, his written disapproval thereof, no such guaranty or acquisition shall become effective until the ascertainment and payment of the award provided for in this Code section. If such disapproval is so filed, either the dissenting stockholder or the corporation may, within ten days thereafter, apply by petition to the commission, on 15 days’ notice, for an adjudication by the commission as to whether the action so authorized is for the public benefit. If the commission does not find that such action is for the public benefit, the guaranty or acquisition shall not become effective unless the consent of all of the other stockholders is given thereto within 30 days after the report of the findings of the commission. If the commission finds that such action is for the public benefit, the value of the stock of the dissenting stockholder, without regard to appreciation or depreciation thereof in consequence of such action, shall be ascertained by a proceeding to be held in the county of the principal office of the corporation and thereafter paid to such dissenting stockholder, all in accordance with Title 22, so far as such title may be applicable; and thereupon the dissenting stockholder shall transfer his stock to the corporation, to be disposed of by the directors or to be retained for the benefit of the remaining stockholders.

History.

Ga. L. 1909, p. 163, § 2; Civil Code 1910, § 2608; Code 1933, § 94-1015.

46-8-336.
Manner of acquiring property, franchises, and rights; nature of rights and privileges of purchasing or consolidated corporation; Secretary of State’s certificate as evidence of existence of corporation.

Before any acquisition under Code Section 46-8-334 of the physical property, rights, and franchises of any corporation shall become effective, the directors of the selling and purchasing corporations shall enter into a joint agreement prescribing the terms and conditions of the transaction; the name by which the purchasing or consolidated corporation shall be known; the number, names, and places of residence of the first directors and the officers thereof (who shall hold their offices until their successors have been chosen or appointed); the number of the shares of the capital stock, whether common or preferred, and the amount or par value of each share thereof, of such purchasing or consolidated corporation; and all such other provisions and details as such first-mentioned directors shall deem necessary to perfect such acquisition.

The agreement shall thereafter be considered by the stockholders of each of the corporations. If the agreement is ratified by a vote of a majority of the stock of each of the corporations, that fact shall be certified upon the agreement by the secretaries of the respective corporations, under the seals thereof; and the agreement so adopted, ratified, and certified shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State.

If the Secretary of State is satisfied that Code Sections 46-8-334 and 46-8-335 have been complied with in relation to such acquisition, and that the acquisition is not inhibited by any provision of the Constitution of Georgia or of the Constitution and statutes of the United States, he shall thereupon issue his certificate that said corporations have complied with said Code sections and that such purchasing or consolidated corporation shall thenceforth constitute a corporation by the name provided in the agreement.

After the issuance of the certificate by the Secretary of State, the purchasing or consolidated corporation shall be possessed of all the rights, privileges, powers, and franchises, of both a public and a private nature, and be subject to all the duties and liabilities, debts, and obligations of each of the corporations participating in the agreement; and said certificate of the Secretary of State, or a duplicate thereof duly certified, shall be conclusive evidence of the existence of such corporation in all the courts of this state.

History.

Ga. L. 1909, p. 163, § 3; Civil Code 1910, § 2609; Code 1933, § 94-1016.

46-8-337.
Issuance of bonds, notes, or other indebtedness by consolidated corporation; pledge of security.

The consolidated corporation formed pursuant to Code Sections 46-8-334 through 46-8-336 shall have authority to issue its bonds, notes, and other evidences of indebtedness and to secure the same by mortgage or deed of trust, or otherwise, upon all its property or franchises, for any corporate purpose, within the limitations and in the manner prescribed by the laws of this state.

History.

Ga. L. 1909, p. 163, § 4; Civil Code 1910, § 2610; Code 1933, § 94-1017.

46-8-338.
Tax exemption for property and capital stock of street, suburban, or interurban railroad companies with tracks and appurtenances extended into adjoining state.

Any company that extends its railroad into an adjoining state shall not be required to pay to this state or to any county or municipality herein any taxes with respect to so much of the property or capital stock of such company as is situated or employed in the adjoining state.

History.

Ga. L. 1902, p. 69, § 2; Civil Code 1910, § 2604; Code 1933, § 94-1012.

46-8-339.
Authority of street, suburban, and interurban railroad companies to furnish steam for heating and power purposes and to lay and maintain steampipes.

Street, suburban, and interurban railroad companies incorporated under the laws of this state shall have the authority to furnish steam for heating and power purposes to any person within the limits of the counties in which such companies operate, with authority to charge and collect reasonable compensation for the same and with full power to do any and all things necessary or convenient to carry into full effect the authority conferred by this Code section, and to use the streets and public places to lay and maintain their pipes and other appliances for conveying and distributing such steam, provided that before any such company shall be entitled to use any of the streets of any city in this state, the consent of such city shall be obtained.

History.

Ga. L. 1903, p. 684, § 1; Civil Code 1910, § 2606; Code 1933, § 94-1005.

46-8-340.
Free transportation for policemen, firemen, and other members of municipal and county utility departments by street, suburban, and interurban railroad companies.

Any street, suburban, or interurban railroad company may furnish free transportation, over its lines operated in any city, to the members of that city’s police force and fire, sanitary, and water departments, if that city has a regularly organized police force and fire, sanitary, and water departments; to city marshals and their deputies; and to police officers of the county in which that city is located. Nothing in this Code section shall authorize any such company to grant individual members of such municipal and county forces and departments any transportation or other special privilege not participated in by all of the members thereof on like terms and under like conditions. All grants or concessions made pursuant to this Code section shall be made to the governing authority of such city, for and in behalf of the members of such municipal and county forces and departments and shall be formally accepted by such authority.

History.

Ga. L. 1909, p. 168, § 1; Civil Code 1910, § 2605; Code 1933, § 94-1009; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 46.

Cross references.

Acceptance of favors or free passes from railroads as constituting grounds for impeachment of judges, §

15-1-7

.

46-8-341.
Lease and sale of roads, franchises, and property between street, suburban, and interurban railroad companies; property purchaser’s liability for debts and claims against lessor or vendor.

All street, suburban, and interurban railroad companies may lease or sell their roads, franchises, and other property to any other company created under the laws of this state for street, suburban, or interurban railroad purposes; and their franchises and property so sold shall remain liable, in the hands of the lessee or purchaser, for all debts or claims against the company making the conveyance. Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to authorize any such company to sell, lease, or otherwise dispose of any of its property or franchises so as to defeat or lessen competition or to encourage monopoly.

History.

Ga. L. 1890-91, p. 170, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 2184; Civil Code 1910, § 2614; Code 1933, § 94-1013.

46-8-342.
Acquisition, sale, operation, transfer, or disposal of motor buses and trackless trolleys by street, suburban, and interurban railroad companies.

All street, suburban, or interurban railroad companies incorporated under the laws of this state shall have the power to purchase, acquire, own, hold, lease, operate, mortgage, sell, assign, transfer, pledge, or otherwise dispose of motor buses or trackless trolleys; to purchase, acquire, own, hold, mortgage, sell, assign, transfer, pledge, or otherwise dispose of the capital stock, bonds, or other securities or evidences of indebtedness of corporations organized to own and operate motor buses or trackless trolleys; to issue their own capital stock or bonds or other securities in payment therefor; and, while they are the owners of such stock in such companies, to exercise all the rights of stockholders, provided that nothing in this Code section shall be construed to confer upon any person any exclusive or irrevocable right or franchise to operate motor buses or trackless trolleys upon the public highways of this state or upon the public streets, lanes, or alleys of any municipality. Such person shall, in regard to the operating of such motor buses and trackless trolleys, be subject, in addition to its occupation or other taxes or assessments, to the same occupation or other taxes as are those persons engaged exclusively in the business of operating motor buses or trackless trolleys. This Code section shall not be construed to confer any right to use the public streets, lanes, or alleys of any municipality without the consent of such municipality; and such municipality shall have no authority to confer any irrevocable right to such companies to use such public streets, lanes, or alleys.

Any motor buses and trackless trolleys when operated by any such railroad company shall be subject to the rules and regulations of the commission, provided that trackless trolleys shall be classed as streetcars and the operations thereof shall be subject to the same municipal ordinances, rules, and regulations, and the vehicles and structures incident to the operations thereof shall be subject to the same state, county, municipal, and school district taxes that apply to the operation of streetcars. Such taxes shall be allocated among counties, municipalities, and school districts served on the same basis as is required of street railroads by law.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to modify Code Section 46-8-343, relating to substitution by street, suburban, or interurban railroad companies of trackless trolleys for rail systems in parts thereof. Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to impair any valid contract or ordinance contract existing between any municipality and any street, suburban, or interurban railroad company as of March 27, 1941. The commission shall not have the power or authority to increase or authorize the increase of, in regard to trackless trolley service, fares which have been fixed prior to March 27, 1941, by contract or ordinance contract on the lines on which trackless trolleys may be substituted pursuant to Code Section 46-8-343. Such fares shall in all respects appertain and apply to such substituted service when inaugurated.

History.

Ga. L. 1924, p. 99, § 1; Ga. L. 1925, p. 219, §§ 1, 2; Code 1933, § 94-1010; Ga. L. 1941, p. 529, §§ 1, 2.

46-8-343.
Utilization of trackless trolleys by street, suburban, or interurban railroad companies.

Any company owning, leasing, or operating street railroads, suburban railroads, or interurban railroads in this state shall, by virtue of this Code section, and without any action on the part of the commission, have the right and privilege of substituting what are known as trackless trolleys on any part or line of its railroad system, provided that consent thereto is obtained from each municipality affected by any such proposed substitution, which consent on the part of any municipality shall not be construed to impair any valid existing contract or ordinance contract now in existence between any such municipality and any such company; provided, further, that nothing in this Code section shall be construed to impair any valid existing contract or ordinance contract now in existence between any such municipality and any such company; provided, further, that the commission shall not have the power or authority to increase or authorize the increase of, in regard to such substituted service, fares which have been fixed prior to March 30, 1937, by contract or ordinance contract on the line or lines on which such trackless trolleys may be so substituted, which fares shall in all respects appertain and apply to such substituted service when thus inaugurated.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 798, § 1.

46-8-344.
Sale of street, suburban, or interurban railroad and bus transportation operations by companies engaged in operating electric generating plants, generally.

Any electric street, suburban, or interurban railroad company which is incorporated under the laws of Georgia and which, in pursuance of the laws of this state, in addition to operating street, suburban, or interurban railroad and bus transportation facilities, is engaged in the operation of electric generating plants for the purpose of supplying motive power for the operation of its railroad and for the production, distribution, and sale of electricity for light, heat, and power purposes in the area served may sell and dispose of its railroad and bus transportation service and equipment, its railroad and bus franchises, and may continue its corporate existence and the operation of its electric power plants and facilities for the production, distribution, and sale of electricity for light, heat, and power purposes under the charter granted to it as a street, suburban, and interurban railroad corporation to the date of expiration of such charter, notwithstanding the sale or other disposition of its railroad and bus properties and franchises.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 260, § 1; Ga. L. 1947, p. 495, § 1.

46-8-345.
Consent by municipality to sale of street, suburban, or interurban railroad and bus properties and franchises; hearing
for approval of sale; filing of board resolution, resolution of municipality, and order of approval.

Any electric street, suburban, or interurban railroad corporation which desires to avail itself of the provisions of Code Section 46-8-344 shall, before consummating such sale or other disposition of its railroad and bus properties and franchises:

Secure the consent of the mayor and council or other governing body of the municipality served by such railroad and bus transportation facilities to the sale or other disposition of the railroad and bus properties and franchises, such consent to be evidenced by a certified copy of a resolution or an ordinance of such governing body;

Apply by petition to the commission on 15 days’ notice for an adjudication, after a public hearing on the merits of the proposed sale, the solvency and eligibility under the laws of Georgia of the prospective purchaser and his ability and capacity to render adequate and satisfactory service, as to whether the proposed sale or other disposition is in the public interest. A certified copy of the order of the mayor and council or other governing body of the municipality, evidencing its consent to the sale or other disposition of the railroad and bus property, shall be attached to and made a part of such petition; and

After securing the order of approval of the commission of the sale or other disposition of such railroad and bus properties and franchises as being in the public interest, file with the Secretary of State, as an amendment to its charter, a certified copy of a resolution of the board of directors reciting that the company elects to sell its railroad and bus properties and franchises and to avail itself of the provisions of Code Section 46-8-344. The company shall attach to the resolution a certified copy of the resolution or ordinance of the mayor and council or other governing body of the municipality evidencing its consent to such sale or other disposition of its railroad and bus properties and franchises. The company shall also attach to the resolution a certified copy of the commission’s order of approval of the sale or other disposition of the railroad and bus property as being in the public interest.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 260, § 2.

46-8-346.
Effect of sale on corporate existence, powers, and liabilities of company.

Upon compliance with Code Sections 46-8-344 and 46-8-345, the electric street, suburban, or interurban railroad company shall be authorized to sell or otherwise dispose of its railroad and bus properties and franchises and to continue its corporate existence and the operation of its electric plants and properties for the sale and distribution of electricity for light, heat, and power purposes under its current charter to the date of expiration thereof, with all of the rights, powers, and liabilities which it previously exercised, in such manner as if no sale of such railroad and bus properties and franchises had been made.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 260, § 3.

46-8-347.
Adoption of chapter by railroad companies.

Any railroad company desiring to adopt this chapter as a part of its charter may so signify by resolution of its board of directors filed with the Secretary of State. The certificate of the Secretary of State that such resolution has been filed with him shall be conclusive evidence of such filing and shall clothe the company with the powers specified in this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1894, p. 70, § 3; Civil Code 1895, § 2183; Civil Code 1910, § 2613; Code 1933, § 94-1008.

46-8-348.
Jurisdiction of commission over interurban railroads; applicability of laws pertaining to other railroad companies; existing contracts between municipalities and railroad companies; fares established by contract prior to August 16, 1921.

Nothing in this article shall be construed as depriving the commission of jurisdiction over interurban railroad companies or limiting its powers in any way, but all of the laws of this state which apply to railroads in general, and to street and suburban railroads in particular, shall, as far as applicable or appropriate, apply to interurban railroads, unless interurban railroads are expressly excluded from the provisions of such laws by the terms thereof. The benefits of this article shall extend to all companies incorporated in this state prior to August 19, 1916, with the power to build or operate electric street and suburban railroads and which, as of August 19, 1916, were operating street and suburban railroads partly in an incorporated city and extending through the country to another incorporated city, including those railroads which run between an incorporated city in Georgia and an incorporated city in an adjoining state. Nothing in this article shall be construed to impair any valid, subsisting contract existing as of August 16, 1921, between any municipality and any railroad company or any street or interurban railroad company. Nothing in this article shall operate to repeal any municipal ordinance existing as of August 16, 1921. The commission shall not have the power and authority under this article to increase fares on the lines of such companies which fares have been fixed by contract between such companies and any municipality prior to August 16, 1921.

History.

Ga. L. 1916, p. 44, § 1; Ga. L. 1921, p. 107, § 1; Code 1933, § 94-1007.